New Jersey, session 221, A2028.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section: Commissioner means the Commissioner of Health. Birthing center means a birthing center licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). Doula means a trained professional who provides continuous physical, emotional, and informational support to a mother before, during, and after labor and childbirth, to help her to achieve the healthiest, most satisfying experience possible. Hospital means every general or special hospital licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.) that provides maternity services. b.  Each hospital and birthing center shall, commencing no later than the 180th day after the effective date of this act, adopt and maintain written policies and procedures authorizing a patient to select a doula of the patients choice to accompany the patient within the facilitys premises for the purposes of providing support before, during, and after labor and childbirth. c.  Each hospital and birthing center shall provide a written copy of the policies and procedures adopted pursuant to subsection b. of this section to: (1)  each health care provider providing maternity services at the facility; (2)  each patient receiving maternity services at the facility; and (3)  any other person, at the request of the patient. d.  Each hospital and birthing center shall post a summary of the facilitys policies and procedures adopted pursuant to subsection b. of this section on the facilitys Internet website. e.  Each hospital and birthing center shall designate a staff member to serve as a liaison between the facility and doulas and doula organizations in order to provide information concerning the facilitys policies and procedures adopted pursuant to subsection b. of this section. 2.  The Commissioner of Health may adopt rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L. 1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) as the commissioner deems necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.